Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1154.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 11-47-2 and 11-47-42 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47 entitled
"Weapons" are hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-2. Definitions.
When used in this chapter, the following words and phrases are construed as follows:
(1) “3D printing process” means 3D printing or additive manufacturing which is a process
of making three (3) dimensional solid objects from a computer file and shall include any of various
processes in which material is joined or solidified under computer control to create a three (3)
dimensional object, with material being added together including liquid molecules or powder
grains.
(2) “Antique firearm” is defined as that term is defined under the provisions of 18 U.S.C.
§ 921.
(3) “Binary trigger” means a device that replaces a standard trigger on a semi-automatic
weapon and is designed to fire one round on the pull of the trigger and another round upon release
of the trigger.
(4) “Bump-fire stock” means any device that replaces a semi-automatic weapon’s standard
stock and is designed to slide back and forth rapidly, harnessing the weapon’s recoil to rapidly fire
the weapon.
(5) “Crime of violence” means and includes any of the following crimes or an attempt to
commit any of them: murder, manslaughter, rape, first- or second-degree sexual assault, first- or

second-degree child molestation, kidnapping, first- and second-degree arson, mayhem, robbery,
burglary, breaking and entering, any felony violation involving the illegal manufacture, sale, or
delivery of a controlled substance, or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, or deliver a
controlled substance classified in schedule I or schedule II of § 21-28-2.08, any violation of § 21-
28-4.01.1 or § 21-28-4.01.2 or conspiracy to commit any violation of these statutes, assault with a
dangerous weapon, assault or battery involving grave bodily injury, or assault with intent to commit
any offense punishable as a felony; upon any conviction of an offense punishable as a felony
offense under § 12-29-5.
(6) "Electronic dart gun" means any handheld device that transmits an electrical current
from the device to a person by expelling steel or metal prongs, darts or projectiles to make contact
with a person, and is activated by a trigger or button.
(6)(7) “Firearm” includes any machine gun, pistol, rifle, air rifle, air pistol, “blank gun,”
“BB gun,” or other instrument from which steel or metal projectiles are propelled, or that may
readily be converted to expel a projectile, except crossbows, recurve, compound, or longbows, and
except instruments propelling projectiles that are designed or normally used for a primary purpose
other than as a weapon. The frame or receiver of the weapon shall be construed as a firearm under
the provisions of this section.
(7)(8) “Fugitive from justice” means any person who has fled from any state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or possession of the United States to avoid prosecution for a crime of violence
or to avoid giving testimony in any criminal proceeding.
(8)(9) “Ghost gun” means a firearm, including a frame or receiver, that lacks a unique serial
number engraved or cased in metal alloy on the frame or receiver by a licensed manufacturer,
maker, or importer under federal law or markings in accordance with 27 C.F.R. § 479.102. It does
not include a firearm that has been rendered permanently inoperable, or a firearm that is not
required to have a serial number in accordance with the federal Gun Control Act of 1968.
(9)(10) “Licensing authorities” means the board of police commissioners of a city or town
where the board has been instituted, the chief of police or superintendent of police of other cities
and towns having a regular organized police force, and, in towns where there is no chief of police
or superintendent of police, it means the town clerk who may issue licenses upon the
recommendation of the town sergeant, and it also means any other person or body duly authorized
by the city or town charter or by state law.
(10)(11) “Machine gun” means any weapon that shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be
readily restored to shoot automatically more than one shot, without manual reloading, by a single
function of the trigger. The term also includes the frame or receiver of the weapon, any combination
LC002944 - Page 2 of 6

of parts designed and intended for use in converting a weapon into a machine gun, and any
combination of parts from which a machine gun can be assembled if the parts are in the possession
or under the control of a person.
(11)(12) “Major component” means, with respect to a firearm:
(i) The slide or cylinder or the frame or receiver of the firearm; and
(ii) In the case of a rifle or shotgun, includes the barrel of the firearm.
(12)(13) “Person” includes an individual, partnership, firm, association, or corporation.
(13)(14) “Pistol” includes any pistol or revolver, and any shotgun, rifle, or similar weapon
with overall length less than twenty-six inches (26″), but does not include any pistol or revolver
designed for the use of blank cartridges only.
(14)(15) “Rifle” shall have the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. § 5845(c), and by barrel
length and overall length not be subject to registration pursuant to the National Firearms Act, 26
U.S.C. ch. 53 (prior § 5801 et seq.).
(15)(16) “Sawed-off rifle” means any rifle with overall length of less than twenty-six
inches (26″) or barrel length of less than sixteen inches (16″).
(16)(17) “Sawed-off shotgun” means any shotgun with overall length of less than twenty-
six inches (26″) or barrel length of less than eighteen inches (18″).
(17)(18) “Sell” includes let or hire, give, lend, and transfer, and “purchase” includes hire,
accept, and borrow, and “purchasing” shall be construed accordingly.
(18)(19) “Shotgun” shall have the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. § 5845(d), and by barrel
length and overall length not be subject to registration pursuant to the National Firearms Act, 26
U.S.C. ch. 53 (prior § 5801 et seq.).
(20) “Stun gun” means a battery powered handheld device that transmits an electric charge
from the device to a person, while touching or applying the device to a person, and is activated by
a trigger or button.
(19)(21) “Trigger crank” means a trigger actuator that attaches to the trigger of a semi-
automatic weapon and causes the weapon to fire by turning the crank handle.
(20)(22) “Undetectable firearm” means any firearm that:
(i) After removal of all parts, other than a major component, is not as detectable by walk-
through metal detectors commonly used at airports or other public buildings; or
(ii) Any major component of which, if subjected to inspection by the types of detection
devices commonly used at airports or other public buildings for security screening, would not
generate an image that accurately depicts the shape of the component; or
(iii) Is manufactured wholly of plastic, fiberglass, or through a 3D printing process; or
LC002944 - Page 3 of 6

(iv) Upon which the frame or receiver lacks a unique serial number engraved or cased into
on the frame or receiver by a licensed manufacturer, maker, or importer under federal law, or
markings in accordance with 27 C.F.R. § 479.102. Provided, however, this subsection shall not
apply to any firearm rendered permanently inoperable or a firearm manufactured prior to 1968.
11-47-42. Weapons other than firearms prohibited.
(a)(1) No person shall carry or possess or attempt to use against another any instrument or
weapon of the kind commonly known as a blackjack, slingshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, metal
knuckles, slap glove, bludgeon, stun-gun, or the so called “Kung-Fu” weapons.
(2) No person shall with intent to use unlawfully against another, carry or possess a
crossbow, dagger, dirk, stiletto, sword-in-cane, bowie knife, or other similar weapon designed to
cut and stab another.
(3) No person shall wear or carry concealed upon his person, any of the above-mentioned
instruments or weapons, or any razor, or knife of any description having a blade of more than three
(3) inches in length measuring from the end of the handle where the blade is attached to the end of
the blade, or other weapon of like kind or description.
Any person violating the provisions of these subsections shall be punished by a fine of not
more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both,
and the weapon so found shall be confiscated.
Any person violating the provisions of these subsections while he or she is incarcerated
within the confines of the adult correctional institutions shall be punished by a fine of not less than
one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by imprisonment
for not less than one year nor more than five (5) years, or both, and the weapon so found shall be
confiscated.
(b) No person shall sell to a person under eighteen (18) years of age, without the written
authorization of the minor’s parent or legal guardian, any stink bomb, blackjack, slingshot, bill,
sandclub, sandbag, metal knuckles, slap glove, bludgeon, stungun, paint ball gun, so called “kung-
fu” weapons, dagger, dirk, stiletto, sword-in-cane, bowie knife, razor, or knife of any description
having a blade of more than three inches (3″) in length as described in subsection (a) of this section,
or any multi-pronged star with sharpened edges designed to be used as a weapon and commonly
known as a Chinese throwing star, except that an individual who is actually engaged in the
instruction of martial arts and licensed under § 5-43-1 may carry and possess any multi-pronged
star with sharpened edges for the sole purpose of instructional use. Any person violating the
provisions of this subsection shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars
($1,000) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by imprisonment for not less than one
LC002944 - Page 4 of 6

year nor more than five (5) years, or both, and the weapons so found shall be confiscated.
SECTION 2. Chapter 11-47 of the General Laws entitled "Weapons" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
11-47-8.2. Purchase, possession, sale or use of stun gun or electronic dart gun.
(a) Except as otherwise prohibited by law or the provisions of § 11-47-5, a person eighteen
(18) years of age or over may purchase a stun gun or electronic dart gun.
(b) No person shall sell or attempt to sell, transfer, deliver or furnish a stun gun or electronic
dart gun to a person who is less than eighteen (18) years of age. Any person convicted of violating
the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a felony and may be punished by imprisonment
for not more than five (5) years.
(c) No person shall use or attempt to use a stun gun or electronic dart gun in the commission
of a crime. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a
felony and may be punished by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment
for not more than ten (10) years, or both.
(d) No person shall use or attempt to use a stun gun or electronic dart gun on a police officer
who is engaged in the performance of their duty. Any person convicted of violating the provisions
of this subsection shall be guilty of a felony and may be punished by a fine of up to ten thousand
dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or both. Any sentence
imposed upon a person pursuant to this subsection shall be imposed consecutively to and not
concurrently with any sentence imposed for the underlying crime or attempted crime, and the
person shall not be afforded the benefits of suspension or deferment of sentence.
(e) No person shall purchase, own, carry, transport, or have in their possession any stun
gun or electronic dart gun if that person is prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to § 11-
47-5, or has, in this state or elsewhere, entered a plea of nolo contendere to or been convicted of a
felony.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002944
========
LC002944 - Page 5 of 6